Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.150

Registration required—Penalty.

No salesperson shall solicit purchasers on behalf of a commercial telephone solicitor who is not currently registered with the department of licensing pursuant to this chapter. Any salesperson who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1989 c 20 s 15.]